Wisconsin, session 2025, AB947.
do enact as follows:AB947,11Section 1. 20.455 (2) (im) of the statutes is amended to read:AB947,2,3220.455 (2) (im) Training to school staff. All moneys received from fees 3collected under s. 165.28 (3) to provide training to school staff under s. 165.28 (3).AB947,24Section 2. 38.12 (15) of the statutes is created to read:AB947,2,7538.12 (15) Campus safety plan. (a) Each district board shall establish, 6maintain, and have in effect a campus safety plan for the technical colleges of the 7district.AB947,2,138(b) A campus safety plan shall be created with the active participation of 9appropriate parties, which may include the department of justice, local law 10enforcement officers, firefighters, instructors and other staff, students, and mental 11health professionals. Before creating or updating a campus safety plan, a district 12board shall, in consultation with a local law enforcement agency, conduct an on-site 13safety assessment of campus buildings and facilities regularly occupied by students.AB947,2,1414(c) A campus safety plan shall include all of the following:AB947,3,411. An individualized safety plan for each campus building and facility that is 2regularly occupied by students. The individualized safety plan shall include any 3real property related to the campus building or facility that is regularly occupied by 4students.AB947,3,652. General guidelines specifying procedures for emergency prevention and 6mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery.AB947,3,1173. Guidelines and procedures to address campus violence and attacks, threats 8of campus violence and attacks, bomb threats, fire, weather-related emergencies, 9intruders, parent-student reunification, and threats to non-classroom events, 10including performances, athletic events, and any other extracurricular activity or 11event.AB947,3,1412(d) A district board shall determine which persons are required to receive 13campus safety plan training and the frequency of the training. The training shall 14be based upon the district board’s prioritized needs, risks, and vulnerabilities.AB947,3,1615(e) 1. In this paragraph, “interactive critical mapping data” has the meaning 16given in s. 165.88 (3m) (ac).AB947,3,21172. Upon the creation of a campus safety plan and upon each review of a 18campus safety plan under par. (g), a district board shall submit a copy of the most 19recent blueprints or interactive critical mapping data for each campus building and 20facility to each local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over any portion of 21the campus and to the office of school safety.AB947,3,2322(f) A district board may not include in a campus safety plan any of the 23following:AB947,4,211. A requirement for an employee to contact any district board administrator 2before calling the telephone number “911.”AB947,4,432. A prohibition against an employee reporting campus violence or a threat of 4campus violence directly to a law enforcement agency.AB947,4,653. A prohibition against an employee reporting a suspicious individual or 6activity directly to a law enforcement agency.AB947,4,87(g) Each district board shall review and approve its campus safety plan at 8least once every 3 years after the plan goes into effect.AB947,4,129(h) Before January 1, 2027, and before each January 1 thereafter, each 10district board shall file a copy of its campus safety plan with the office of school 11safety. At the time the district board files a campus safety plan, the district board 12shall also submit all of the following to the office of school safety:AB947,4,14131. The date of the most recent training on campus safety required under par. 14(d) and the number of attendees.AB947,4,16152. The most recent date on which the district board reviewed and approved 16the campus safety plan.AB947,4,18173. The most recent date on which the district board consulted with a local law 18enforcement agency to conduct on-site safety assessments required under par. (b).AB947,319Section 3. 165.28 of the statutes is renumbered 165.28 (1m) and 165.28 (1m) 20(intro.) and (c), as renumbered, are amended to read:AB947,4,2221165.28 (1m) (intro.) The office of school safety shall do all of the following with 22respect to schools:AB947,5,423(c) Offer, or contract with another party to offer, training to school staff on 24school safety. Training subjects may include trauma informed care and how 1adverse childhood experiences have an impact on a child’s development and 2increase needs for counseling or support. If a school receives under s. 165.88 (2) (b) 3a grant for the training under this subsection paragraph, the office may charge a fee 4for the training.AB947,45Section 4. 165.28 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB947,5,76165.28 (2m) The office of school safety shall do all of the following with 7respect to technical colleges:AB947,5,108(a) In conjunction with the technical college system board, create model 9practices for campus safety. The technical college system board shall provide any 10resources or staff requested by the office to create the model practices.AB947,5,1411(b) Coordinate with each district board under s. 38.12 (15) (e) to compile 12blueprints or interactive critical mapping data, as defined in s. 165.88 (3m) (ac), for 13all campuses. The office shall keep all blueprints and data confidential unless a 14law enforcement agency requests access.AB947,5,1715(c) Offer, or contract with another party to offer, training to the staff at each 16technical college on campus safety. If a college receives a grant under s. 165.88 (2) 17for the training under this paragraph, the office may charge a fee for the training.AB947,518Section 5. 165.88 (title), (2) (title), (a) and (b), (3) (a) and (b), (3m) (title), 19(am), (b) and (c) and (4) of the statutes are amended to read:AB947,6,320165.88 (title) Grants for school safety and safety of college campuses. 21(2) (title) Grants for school safety and safety of campuses. (a) From the 22appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (f), the department of justice shall award grants 23for expenditures related to improving school safety and improving campus safety at 24technical colleges. The department shall accept applications for a grant for school 1safety under this subsection from school boards, operators of independent charter 2schools, governing bodies of private schools, and tribal schools and shall accept 3applications for a grant for campus safety from technical college district boards.AB947,6,144(b) The department of justice, in consultation with the department of public 5instruction, shall develop a plan for use in awarding grants under this subsection. 6The department of justice shall include in the plan a description of what types of 7expenditures are eligible to be funded by grant proceeds. Eligible expenditures 8shall include expenditures to comply with the model practices created in s. 165.28 9(1) (1m) (a) or (2m) (a), whichever is appropriate; expenditures for training under s. 10165.28 (3) (1m) (c) or (2m) (c), whichever is appropriate; expenditures for safety-11related upgrades to school buildings, equipment, and facilities; and expenditures 12necessary to comply with s. 38.12 (15) (e) or 118.07 (4) (cf), whichever is 13appropriate. Notwithstanding s. 227.10 (1), the plan need not be promulgated as 14rules under ch. 227.AB947,6,1515(3) (a) A school safety plan or a campus safety plan.AB947,6,1816(b) Blueprints or interactive critical mapping data, as defined in sub. (3m) 17(ac), for each school building and facility or, if blueprints or the data were already 18submitted, a certification that the items submitted are current.AB947,7,219(3m) (title) Grants to schools for interactive critical mapping data. 20(am) From the appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (f), the department of justice shall 21award grants to school boards and governing bodies of private schools to assist them 22in complying with the requirement under s. 118.07 (4) (cf) to submit interactive 23critical mapping data to law enforcement agencies and the office of school safety 1and shall award grants to technical colleges to assist them in complying with the 2requirements under s. 38.12 (15) (e).AB947,7,73(b) The department shall accept applications for the grants under this 4subsection to comply with s. 118.07 (4) (cf) from school district administrators, or 5governing bodies of private schools, that are working jointly with local law 6enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the school and grants to comply with s. 738.12 (15) (e) from technical college district boards.AB947,7,168(c) Grant moneys awarded under this subsection shall be used for site-specific 9interactive critical mapping data to enhance security and increase situational 10awareness for first responders. Any interactive critical mapping data created with 11grant money under this subsection shall be compatible with platforms and 12applications used by local, state, and federal public safety officials; may not require 13local, state, or federal public safety officials, school districts, or private schools 14grant recipients to purchase additional software; and shall include information that 15can best assist first responders in an emergency, such as building numbers, floors, 16suite designations, room numbers, or other available relevant location information.AB947,7,2017(4) Report. The department of justice shall submit an annual report to the 18cochairpersons of the joint committee on finance providing an account of the grants 19awarded under sub. (2) this section and the expenditures made with the grant 20moneys.AB947,7,2121